Tennessee, session 114, HB2097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1506(a), is amended by
deleting the language "fifty dollars ($50.00) per calendar day for each day" and substituting
instead the language "five percent (5%) of the principal amount owed per month for each
month".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1509, is amended by deleting
the language "June 30, 2026" and substituting instead the language "June 30, 2027".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2097
012649
- 1 -